New York, session 2025-2026, S5254.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 27-b of the labor law is amended 2 by adding a new paragraph d-1 to read as follows: 3 d-1. No employee who accompanies the commissioner on an inspection, 4 participates in a risk evaluation and determination inspection, or 5 participates in an annual program review shall suffer any reduction in 6 wages. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07268-01-5